Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 161.365 is amended to read:
161.365. (1) When the court has reason to doubt the defendant’s fitness to proceed by reason  of
incapacity as described in  ORS 161.360, the court may call any witness to its assistance in reaching
its decision and shall  order that a community mental health program director , or the director’s
designee , consult with the defendant and with any local entity that  would be responsible for
supervising the defendant if the defendant were to be released in the community,  to determine
whether services and supervision necessary to safely [ restore] allow the [ defendant’s] defendant to
gain or regain  fitness to proceed are available in the community.  After the consultation, the pro-
gram director or the director’s designee shall provide to the court a copy of the  findings resulting
from the consultation. If the court determines the  assistance of a psychiatrist or psychologist would
be helpful, the court may:
(a) Order that a psychiatric or psychological examination of the defendant be conducted by  a
certified evaluator as defined in ORS 161.309 and a report of the examination be prepared; or
(b) Order the defendant  to be committed for the purpose of an examination [ for a period not
exceeding 30 days ] to a state mental hospital or other facility designated by the Oregon Health Au-
thority if the defendant is at least 18  years of age, or to a secure intensive community inpatient
facility designated by the authority if the defendant is under 18 years of  age. The state mental
hospital or other facility may retain custody of a  defendant committed under this paragraph
for the duration necessary to complete the examination of the defendant, not to exceed  30
days. The examination may include a period of observation.
(2)(a) A defendant committed under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be  transported
to the state mental hospital or other facility for the examination.
(b) At the conclusion of the examination, the superintendent of the state mental hospital
or the superintendent’s designee or the director of the facility may:
(A) Return the defendant to the facility from which the defendant was transported; or
(B) Inform  the court and the parties that the defendant requires a hospital level of care
due to the defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity  of symptoms of the defendant’s quali-
fying mental disorder and request that the defendant remain at the  state mental hospital or
other facility pending a hearing or order under ORS 161.370.
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 1
(c) If both parties consent, the court may, without holding a hearing, enter  any order
authorized by ORS 161.370 based on  a report resulting from an examination conducted under
this section.
[(2)] (3)  The report of an  examination described in this section must include, but is not neces-
sarily limited to, the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A statement of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) If the defendant suffers from  a qualifying mental disorder, an opinion as to whether the de-
fendant is incapacitated within the description set out in ORS 161.360; and
(d) If the defendant is incapacitated within the description set  out in ORS 161.360, a recom-
mendation of treatment and services necessary to [ restore] allow the  defendant to gain or regain
capacity , including  whether a hospital level of care is required due to the defendant’s
dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder .
[(3)] (4) Except when the defendant and the court both request to the contrary,  the report may
not contain any  findings or conclusions as to whether the defendant as a result of a qualifying
mental disorder was subject to the provisions of ORS 161.295 or 161.300 at the time of the  criminal
act charged.
[(4)] (5)  If the examination by the psychiatrist or psychologist cannot be conducted by reason
of the unwillingness of the defendant to participate in the examination, the report must so  state and
must include, if possible, an opinion as to whether the unwillingness of the defendant was the result
of a qualifying mental disorder affecting capacity to proceed.
[(5)] (6)(a)  The  report  resulting from the examination of a defendant under this section
must be filed with the clerk  of the court, who shall cause copies to be delivered to the district at-
torney and to counsel for defendant.
(b) The entity or evaluator conducting the examination shall provide a copy of the report
resulting from the examination  to the community mental health program director or
designee in:
(A) The county in which the defendant is charged; and
(B) The county of the defendant’s last known residence.
(c) Reports prepared under this section are confidential and may be  made available only:
(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of  the prosecuting or
defense attorney, defendant, community mental health program director or  designee and any
facility in which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(d) Any facility in which a defendant is  housed may not use a report prepared under this
section to support a disciplinary action against the defendant.
(e) Nothing in this subsection  prohibits the prosecuting attorney, defense attorney or
agent of the prosecuting  or defense attorney from discussing the contents of a report pre-
pared under this section with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a)  When upon motion of  the court or a financially eligible defendant, the court has
ordered a psychiatric or psychological examination of the defendant,  a county or justice court shall
order the county to pay, and a circuit  court shall order the public defense services executive di-
rector to pay from funds available for the purpose:
(A) A reasonable fee if the examination of the  defendant is conducted by a psychiatrist or psy-
chologist in private practice; and
(B) All costs including transportation of the defendant if the examination is conducted by a
psychiatrist or psychologist in  the employ of the Oregon Health Authority or a community mental
health program established under ORS 430.610 to 430.670.
(b) When an examination is  ordered at the request or with the acquiescence of a defendant who
is determined  not to be financially eligible, the examination shall be performed at the defendant’s
expense. When an examination is ordered at the request of the prosecution, the county shall pay  for
the expense of the examination.
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 2
[(7)] (8)  The Oregon Health  Authority shall establish by rule standards for the consultation de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 1a. If Senate Bill 25 becomes law, section 1 of this 2019 Act (amending  ORS
161.365) is repealed and ORS 161.365, as amended by section 4, chapter 311, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled Senate Bill 25), is amended to read:
161.365. (1)(a) When the court has reason to doubt the defendant’s fitness  to proceed by reason
of incapacity as described in ORS 161.360, the court may call any  witness to assist it in reaching
its decision and shall order that a community mental health program director , or the director’s
designee , consult with the defendant and with any local entity that would be responsible for
supervising the defendant if the defendant were to be released in the community,  to determine
whether services and supervision necessary to  safely [ restore] allow the [ defendant’s] defendant to
gain or regain  fitness to proceed  are available in the community. After the consultation, the pro-
gram director or  the director’s designee shall provide to the court a copy of the findings resulting
from the consultation. If the  court determines the assistance of a psychiatrist or psychologist would
be helpful, the court may:
(A) Order that a psychiatric or psychological examination of  the defendant be conducted by a
certified evaluator as defined in ORS 161.309 and a report of the examination be prepared; or
(B) Order the  defendant to be committed for the purpose of an examination [ for a period not
exceeding 30 days ] to a state mental hospital or other facility designated by the Oregon Health Au-
thority if the defendant is at least 18 years of age,  or to a secure intensive community inpatient
facility designated by the authority  if the defendant is under 18 years of age. The state mental
hospital or other facility may retain custody of a  defendant committed under this paragraph
for the  duration necessary to complete the examination of the defendant, not to exceed 30
days. The examination may include a period of observation.
(b) The court shall provide a copy of any order  entered under this subsection to the community
mental health program director or designee  and to the state mental hospital or other facility by the
end of the next judicial day.
(2)(a) A defendant committed under subsection (1)(a)(B) of this  section shall be trans-
ported to the state mental hospital or other facility for the examination.
(b) At the conclusion of the examination, the superintendent of the state mental hospital
or the superintendent’s designee or the director of the facility may:
(A) Return the defendant to the facility from which the defendant was transported; or
(B) Inform  the court and the parties that the defendant requires a hospital level of care
due to the defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity  of symptoms of the defendant’s quali-
fying mental disorder and request that the defendant remain at the  state mental hospital or
other facility pending a hearing or order under ORS 161.370.
(c) If both parties consent, the court may, without holding a hearing, enter  any order
authorized by ORS 161.370 based on  a report resulting from an examination conducted under
this section.
[(2)] (3)  The report of an examination described in this section must  include, but is not neces-
sarily limited to, the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A statement of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) If the defendant suffers from a qualifying mental disorder, an opinion  as to whether the de-
fendant is incapacitated within the description set out in ORS 161.360; and
(d) If the defendant is incapacitated within  the description set out in ORS 161.360, a recom-
mendation of treatment and services necessary  to [ restore] allow the defendant to gain or regain
capacity , including whether a hospital level of care is required due to the  defendant’s
dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder .
[(3)] (4)  Except when  the defendant and the court both request to the contrary, the report may
not contain any findings or conclusions as to whether the defendant as a result of  a qualifying
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 3
mental disorder was subject to the provisions of ORS 161.295 or 161.300 at the time of the  criminal
act charged.
[(4)] (5)  If the examination by the psychiatrist or psychologist cannot be conducted by  reason
of the unwillingness of the defendant to participate in the examination, the report must so  state and
must include, if possible, an opinion as to whether the unwillingness of the defendant was the result
of a qualifying mental disorder affecting capacity to proceed.
[(5)] (6)(a) The report resulting from the examination of a defendant under  this section
may be filed electronically and  must be filed with the clerk of the  court , [ and may be filed elec-
tronically. The clerk of the court ] who shall cause copies to be delivered to the  district attorney[ , to
the community mental health program director or designee ] and to counsel for defendant.
(b) The entity or evaluator conducting the examination shall provide a copy of the report
resulting from the examination to the community mental health  program director or
designee in:
(A) The county in which the defendant is charged; and
(B) The county of the defendant’s last known residence.
(c) Reports prepared under this section are confidential and may be  made available only:
(A) To the court,  prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting or
defense attorney, defendant, community mental health program director or  designee and any
facility in which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(d) Any facility in which a defendant is  housed may not use a report prepared under this
section to support a disciplinary action against the defendant.
(e) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the prosecuting  attorney, defense attorney or
agent of the prosecuting or defense attorney from discussing the contents of  a report pre-
pared under this section with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a)  When upon motion of the court or a financially  eligible defendant, the court has
ordered a psychiatric or psychological examination of the defendant,  a county or justice court shall
order the county to pay, and a circuit court shall  order the public defense services executive di-
rector to pay from funds available for the purpose:
(A) A reasonable fee if the examination of the  defendant is conducted by a psychiatrist or psy-
chologist in private practice; and
(B) All costs including transportation of the defendant if the examination is conducted by a
psychiatrist or psychologist in the employ of the Oregon Health Authority or  a community mental
health program established under ORS 430.610 to 430.670.
(b) When an examination is  ordered at the request or with the acquiescence of a defendant who
is determined not to be financially eligible, the examination shall be performed at the  defendant’s
expense. When an examination is ordered at the request of the prosecution, the county shall pay  for
the expense of the examination.
[(7)(a) Reports and evaluations  conducted under this section are confidential and may be made
available only:]
[(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney,  defense attorney, defendant, community mental health pro-
gram director or designee and facility in which the defendant is housed; or ]
[(B) As ordered by a court. ]
[(b) A facility in which a defendant is housed may not  use a report or evaluation conducted under
this section to support a disciplinary action against the defendant. ]
(8) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by  rule standards for the consultation described
in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 161.370 is amended to read:
161.370. (1)(a) When the defendant’s fitness to proceed is drawn in question, the issue shall be
determined by the court.
(b) If neither the prosecuting attorney nor counsel for the  defendant contests the finding of the
report filed under ORS 161.365, the court may make the determination on the basis  of the report.
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 4
If the finding is contested, the court shall hold a hearing on the issue. If the report is received  in
evidence in the hearing, the party who contests the finding has the right to summon and to cross-
examine any psychiatrist or psychologist who submitted the report and  to offer evidence upon the
issue. Other evidence regarding  the defendant’s fitness to proceed may be introduced by either
party.
(2)(a) If the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to  proceed, the criminal proceed-
ing against the defendant shall be suspended  and[ :] the court shall, at a hearing, proceed in ac-
cordance with this subsection.
(b) After making the determination under paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the court
shall receive a recommendation, to be considered at  the hearing, from a community mental
health program director  or the director’s designee, and from any local entity that would be
responsible for supervising the defendant if the defendant  were to be released in the com-
munity, concerning whether services and supervision necessary to safely  allow the defendant
to gain or regain fitness to proceed are available in the community.
(c) The court and the parties shall  at the hearing determine an appropriate action in the
case, and the court  shall enter an order necessary to implement the action. In determining
the appropriate action, the court shall consider the primary and secondary  release criteria
as defined in ORS 135.230, the least restrictive option appropriate for the  defendant, the
needs of the defendant and the interests of justice.  Actions may include but are not limited
to:
(A) Commitment for the defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed under  subsection
(3) or (5) of this section;
(B) Community restoration as recommended by the  community mental health program
director or designee;
(C) Release on supervision;
(D) Commencement of  a civil commitment proceeding under ORS 426.070 to 426.170,
426.701 or 427.235 to 427.290;
(E) Commencement of protective proceedings under ORS chapter 125; or
(F) Dismissal of the charges pursuant to ORS 135.755.
(d) If the court, while  considering or ordering an appropriate action under this sub-
section, determines  that the defendant does not require a hospital level of care due to the
defendant’s dangerousness and the  acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental
disorder, but that services  and supervision necessary to safely allow the defendant to gain
or regain fitness to proceed are not available in the community, for  any defendant remaining
in custody after such determination, the court shall set a  review hearing seven days from
the date of the determination under paragraph (a) of this  subsection. At the review hearing,
the court shall  consider all relevant information and determine an appropriate action in the
case as described in paragraph (c) of this subsection. If the defendant remains in custody
following the initial review hearing,  the court shall hold further review hearings every seven
days thereafter until the defendant is no longer in custody.
[(a)] (3)(a) Unless the court orders an action other than commitment  under subsection
(2) of this section, and except as otherwise provided in subsections (4) and (5) of  this section,
if the court  finds that the defendant is dangerous to self or others as a result of a qualifying mental
disorder,  [ or] that a hospital level of care is necessary due to the defendant’s dangerousness
and the  acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, and  that, based on
the findings resulting  from the consultation described in ORS 161.365 (1)  and from any information
provided by community-based mental health providers or any  other sources , the services and
supervision necessary to [ restore] allow  the [ defendant’s] defendant to gain or regain  fitness to
proceed are not available in the community, the court shall  commit the defendant to the custody
of the superintendent of a state mental hospital or director  of a facility[ ,] designated by the Oregon
Health Authority[ ,] if the defendant is at least  18 years of age, or to the custody of the director of
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 5
a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the authority if  the defendant is under
18 years of age[ ; or ].
(b) If the defendant is committed under this subsection, the  community mental health
program director shall at  regular intervals, during any period of commitment, review avail-
able community resources and  maintain communication with the defendant and the super-
intendent of the state mental hospital or director of the  facility in order to facilitate an
efficient transition to treatment in the community when ordered.
[(b)] (4)(a)  If the court does not  make a finding described in [ paragraph (a) of this subsection, ]
subsection (3) of this section, if commitment is precluded under  subsection (5) of this section
or if the court determines that care other than commitment for  incapacity to stand trial would
better serve the defendant and the community, the court shall release the defendant on supervision
for as long as the unfitness endures.
(b) The court  may order a community mental health program director providing treat-
ment to the defendant in the community  to provide the court with status reports on the
defendant’s progress in gaining or regaining fitness to proceed.
(c) A community mental health program director providing treatment to the defendant
in the community shall notify the court if the defendant gains or regains fitness  to proceed.
(5)(a) If the  most serious offense in the charging instrument is a violation, the court
may not commit the defendant under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) If the most serious offense in  the charging instrument is a misdemeanor, the court
may not commit the defendant under subsection (3) of this section  unless the finding that
the defendant requires a hospital level of care due to  the defendant’s dangerousness and the
acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder is based on  a recommen-
dation by a certified  evaluator as defined in ORS 161.309, or a community mental health
program director or the director’s designee, that the defendant requires such level of care.
(c) If at  the time of determining the appropriate action for the case the court has not
received a recommendation as  to whether the defendant requires a hospital level of care due
to the defendant’s dangerousness  and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying
mental disorder, the court shall order a  certified evaluator or a community mental health
program director, or the director’s designee, to make such a recommendation.
(d) If the  court does not order the commitment of a defendant described in this sub-
section to the state mental  hospital or other facility, the court shall hold a hearing in ac-
cordance with subsection (2)(c) of this section to determine and order  an appropriate action
other than commitment.
[(3)] (6) When a defendant is released on supervision under subsection [ (2)(b)] (4) of this  section,
the court may place conditions that the court deems appropriate on the release, including the  re-
quirement that the defendant regularly report to the  authority or a community mental health pro-
gram for examination to determine if the defendant has gained or regained capacity to stand trial.
[(4)] (7) When the court, on its own  motion or upon the application of the superintendent of the
hospital or director of  the facility in which the defendant is committed, a person examining the de-
fendant as a condition of release on supervision, or either party, determines, after a hearing, if  a
hearing is requested, that  the defendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed, the criminal
proceeding shall be resumed. If, however, the court is of the view that so much  time has elapsed
since the commitment or release of  the defendant on supervision that it would be unjust to resume
the criminal proceeding, the court on motion of either party may dismiss the  charge and may order
the defendant to be discharged or cause a proceeding  to be commenced forthwith under ORS 426.070
to 426.170, 426.701 or 427.235 to 427.290.
[(5)] (8)  The superintendent of a state hospital or director of a facility to  which the defendant
is committed shall cause the defendant  to be evaluated within 60 days from the defendant’s delivery
into the superintendent’s or director’s custody,  for the purpose of determining whether there is a
substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will have  the capacity to stand
trial. In addition, the superintendent or director shall:
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 6
(a) Immediately notify the committing court if the defendant, at any time, gains or regains the
capacity to stand trial or will never have the capacity to stand trial.
(b) Within 90 days of the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s  or director’s custody,
notify the committing court that:
(A) The defendant has the present capacity to stand trial;
(B) There is no substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the  defendant will gain
or regain the capacity to stand trial; or
(C) There is a substantial probability  that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or
regain the capacity to stand trial. If  the probability exists, the superintendent or director shall give
the court an estimate of  the time in which the defendant, with appropriate treatment, is expected
to gain or regain capacity.
[(6)(a)] (9)(a)  If the superintendent or director  determines that there is a substantial probability
that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or  regain the capacity to stand trial, unless
the court otherwise orders, the defendant shall remain in the superintendent’s or  director’s custody
where the defendant shall receive treatment designed for the purpose of enabling the defendant  to
gain or regain capacity. In keeping with the notice requirement under subsection [ (5)(b)] (8)(b)  of
this section, the superintendent or director shall, for the duration of the defendant’s  period of com-
mitment, submit  a progress report to the committing court, concerning the defendant’s capacity or
incapacity, at least once every 180 days as measured from the date of the  defendant’s delivery into
the superintendent’s or director’s custody.
(b)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, if the superintendent or director de-
termines that a defendant committed under this section is  no longer dangerous to self or others as
a result of a qualifying mental disorder, that a hospital level of care is not necessary due to the
defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the  defendant’s qualifying mental
disorder, or that the services and  supervision necessary to [ restore] allow  the [ defendant’s] de-
fendant to gain or  regain  fitness to proceed are available in the community, the superintendent
or director shall file notice of that determination with the court.
(B) Upon receipt  of the notice, [ the court shall order the person released on supervision as de-
scribed in subsection (3)  of this section. ] the court shall order that a community mental health
program director or the director’s designee, within five judicial days:
(i) Consult with the defendant and with any local  entity that would be responsible for
supervising the defendant if  the defendant were to be released in the community to deter-
mine whether services and supervision necessary to  safely allow the defendant to gain or
regain fitness to proceed are available in the community; and
(ii) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation.
(C) Within 10 judicial days of receiving the recommendations  from the consultation, the
court shall hold a hearing to determine an appropriate action in accordance with subsection
(2)(c) of this section as follows:
(i) If, after consideration of the factors and possible actions  described in subsection (2)(c)
of this section, and  any recommendations from the consultation described in this paragraph,
the court determines that the defendant remains dangerous to self or others as a  result of
a qualifying mental disorder, a hospital level of care is necessary  due to the defendant’s
dangerousness and the acuity of  symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, and
the services and supervision necessary to allow the defendant to gain or regain fitness  to
proceed are not available in the community, the court may,  after making specific findings
to that effect, continue the commitment.
(ii) If  the court does not make the findings described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this
subparagraph, the court shall terminate the  commitment and shall set a review hearing
seven days from the date of the commitment  termination for any defendant remaining in
custody. At the review hearing, the court shall consider all relevant information  and deter-
mine an appropriate action in the case as described in subsection (2)(c) of this section.  If the
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 7
defendant remains in custody following the initial review hearing, the court shall hold fur-
ther review hearings every seven days thereafter until the defendant is no longer  in custody.
(c) A progress report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may consist of an update  to:
(A) The original examination report conducted under ORS 161.365; or
(B) An evaluation conducted under subsection  [ (5)] (8)  of this section, if the defendant did not
receive an examination under ORS 161.365.
[(7)(a)] (10)(a) A  defendant who remains committed under subsection [ (6)] (9) of this section shall
be discharged within  a period of time that is reasonable for making a determination concerning
whether or not, and when, the defendant may gain or  regain capacity. However, regardless of the
number of charges with which  the defendant is accused, in no event shall the defendant be com-
mitted for longer than whichever of the following, measured  from the defendant’s initial custody
date, is shorter:
(A) Three years; or
(B) A period of time equal to the maximum  sentence the court could have imposed if the de-
fendant had been convicted.
(b) For purposes of calculating the maximum period  of commitment described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection:
(A) The initial custody date is the date  on which the defendant is first committed under this
section on any charge alleged in the accusatory instrument; and
(B) The defendant shall be given credit against  each charge alleged in the accusatory instru-
ment:
(i) For each day the defendant is committed under this section, whether the days are consecutive
or are interrupted by a period of time during which the defendant  has gained or regained fitness to
proceed;  and
(ii) Unless the defendant is charged  on any  charging instrument  with aggravated murder or
a crime listed in ORS 137.700 (2), for each  day the defendant is held in jail  before and after the
date the defendant is first committed , whether the days are consecutive or are  interrupted by a
period of time during which the defendant lacks fitness to proceed.
[(8)] (11)  The superintendent or director shall notify  the committing court of the defendant’s
impending discharge 30 days before the date on which the superintendent or director  is required to
discharge the defendant under subsection [ (7)] (10) of this section.
[(9)] (12) When the  committing court receives a notice from the superintendent or director under
subsection  [ (5)] (8)  or [ (8)] (11) of this section concerning the defendant’s progress or lack thereof,
the committing court shall determine, after  a hearing, if a hearing is requested, whether the de-
fendant presently has the capacity to stand trial.
[(10)] (13)  If at any time the court determines  that the defendant lacks the capacity to stand
trial, the court shall further determine whether there is a substantial  probability that the defendant,
in the foreseeable future, will  gain or regain the capacity to stand trial and whether the defendant
is entitled to discharge under subsection [ (7)] (10) of this section. If the court determines that there
is no substantial probability that the defendant, in the foreseeable  future, will gain or regain the
capacity to stand trial or that the defendant is entitled  to discharge under subsection [ (7)] (10) of
this section, the court shall dismiss, without prejudice, all charges against the defendant and:
(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or
(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070 or 427.235 to 427.290.
[(11)] (14) All notices required under this section  shall be filed with the clerk of the court and
delivered to both the district attorney and the counsel for the defendant.
[(12)] (15) If the defendant gains or regains fitness to  proceed, the term of any sentence received
by the defendant for  conviction of the crime charged shall be reduced by the amount of time the
defendant was committed under this section to the  custody of a state mental hospital, or to the
custody of a secure intensive community inpatient facility[ ,] designated by the Oregon  Health Au-
thority.
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 8
[(13)] (16) Notwithstanding  the suspension of the criminal proceeding under subsection (2) of this
section, the fact  that the defendant is unfit to proceed does not preclude any objection through
counsel and without the personal participation of the defendant on the grounds that the indictment
is insufficient, that the statute of limitations has run, that double  jeopardy principles apply or upon
any other ground at  the discretion of the court which the court deems susceptible of fair determi-
nation prior to trial.
[(14)] (17)  At the time that the  court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed
under subsection (2) of this  section, the court shall notify the defendant that federal law prohibits
the defendant  from purchasing or possessing a firearm unless the person obtains relief from the
prohibition under federal  law. The court shall again notify the defendant of the prohibition if the
court finds that the defendant has  gained or regained fitness to proceed under subsection [ (4)] (7)
of this section.
(18)(a) The entity  or evaluator conducting an examination of a defendant under this
section shall provide a copy of any  report described in this section to the community mental
health program director or designee in:
(A) The county in which the defendant is charged; and
(B) The county of the defendant’s last known residence.
(b) Reports prepared under this section are confidential and may  be made available only:
(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of  the prosecuting or
defense attorney, defendant, community mental health program director or  designee and any
facility in which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(c) Any facility in which a defendant is housed  may not use a report prepared under this
section to support a disciplinary action against the defendant.
(d) Nothing in this  subsection prohibits the prosecuting attorney, defense attorney or
agent of the prosecuting  or defense attorney from discussing the contents of a report pre-
pared under this section with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law.
(19) Unless the court orders otherwise or either party objects,  a defendant committed to
a state hospital or other facility, or a certified evaluator  or other expert witness, may attend
hearings held under this section via simultaneous electronic transmission.
(20) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule standards for the  recommen-
dation provided to the court described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 2a.
If Senate Bill 25 becomes law, section 2 of this 2019 Act (amending ORS
161.370) is repealed and ORS 161.370, as amended by section 5, chapter 311, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled Senate Bill 25), is amended to read:
161.370. (1)(a) When the defendant’s fitness to proceed is drawn in question, the issue shall be
determined by the court.
(b) If neither the prosecuting attorney nor counsel for the  defendant contests the finding of the
report filed under ORS  161.365, the court may make the determination on the basis of the report.
If the  finding is contested, the court shall hold a hearing on the issue. If the report is received in
evidence in the hearing, the party who contests the finding has the right to summon and to cross-
examine any psychiatrist or psychologist who  submitted the report and to offer evidence upon the
issue. Other evidence regarding the defendant’s fitness to proceed may be  introduced by either
party.
(2)(a) If the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed, the criminal proceeding
against the defendant shall be  suspended and[ :] the court shall, at a hearing, proceed in ac-
cordance with this subsection.
(b) After making the determination under paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the court
shall receive a recommendation, to be considered at  the hearing, from a community mental
health program director  or the director’s designee, and from any local entity that would be
responsible for supervising the defendant if the defendant  were to be released in the com-
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 9
munity, concerning whether services and supervision necessary to safely  allow the defendant
to gain or regain fitness to proceed are available in the community.
(c) The court and the parties shall  at the hearing determine an appropriate action in the
case, and the court shall enter an order necessary to implement the  action. In determining
the appropriate action,  the court shall consider the primary and secondary release criteria
as defined in  ORS 135.230, the least restrictive option appropriate for the defendant, the
needs of the defendant and the interests of  justice. Actions may include but are not limited
to:
(A) Commitment for the defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed under  subsection
(3) or (5) of this section;
(B) Community restoration as recommended  by the community mental health program
director or designee;
(C) Release on supervision;
(D) Commencement of a civil commitment proceeding under ORS 426.070  to 426.170,
426.701 or 427.235 to 427.290;
(E) Commencement of protective proceedings under ORS chapter 125; or
(F) Dismissal of the charges pursuant to ORS 135.755.
(d) If the court, while considering or ordering an appropriate  action under this sub-
section, determines that the defendant does not require a hospital level of care due to  the
defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the  defendant’s qualifying mental
disorder, but that services and supervision necessary to safely allow the  defendant to gain
or regain fitness to proceed are not available in the community, for  any defendant remaining
in custody after such determination, the  court shall set a review hearing seven days from
the date of the determination under paragraph (a) of this  subsection. At the review hearing,
the court shall consider all relevant information and determine an appropriate action  in the
case as described in paragraph (c) of this subsection. If the defendant remains in custody
following the initial review hearing,  the court shall hold further review hearings every seven
days thereafter until the defendant is no longer in custody.
[(A)] (3)(a) Unless the court orders an action other than commitment  under subsection
(2) of this section, and except as otherwise provided in subsections (4) and (5) of  this section,
if the court  finds that the defendant is dangerous to self or others as a result of a qualifying mental
disorder, [ or] that a hospital level of care is necessary due to the defendant’s  dangerousness
and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, and  that, based  on
the findings resulting  from the consultation described in ORS 161.365 (1)  and from any information
provided by community-based mental health providers  or any other sources , the services and
supervision necessary to [ restore] allow  the [ defendant’s] defendant to gain  or regain  fitness to
proceed are not available in the community,  the court shall commit the defendant to the custody
of the superintendent of a state mental hospital or director  of a facility[ ,] designated by the Oregon
Health Authority[ ,] if the defendant is at least 18 years of age, or  to the custody of the director of
a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the authority if  the defendant is under
18 years of age[ ; or ].
(b) If the defendant is committed under this subsection, the  community mental health
program director shall at  regular intervals, during any period of commitment, review avail-
able community resources and  maintain communication with the defendant and the super-
intendent of the state mental hospital or director of the  facility in order to facilitate an
efficient transition to treatment in the community when ordered.
[(B)] (4)(a)  If the court does not make a finding described in [ subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph,] subsection (3) of this section, if  commitment is precluded under subsection (5) of this
section or if the court determines that  care other than commitment for incapacity to stand trial
would better serve the defendant and the community, the court  shall release the defendant on
supervision for as long as the unfitness endures.
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 10
(b) The court may order a community mental health program director  providing treat-
ment to the defendant in the community to provide the  court with status reports on the
defendant’s progress in gaining or regaining fitness to proceed.
(c) A community mental health program director providing treatment to the defendant
in the community shall notify the court if the defendant gains or regains fitness  to proceed.
(5)(a) If the  most serious offense in the charging instrument is a violation, the court
may not commit the defendant under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) If the most serious offense in  the charging instrument is a misdemeanor, the court
may not commit the defendant under subsection (3) of this section  unless the finding that
the defendant requires a hospital level of care due to  the defendant’s dangerousness and the
acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder is based on  a recommen-
dation by a certified  evaluator as defined in ORS 161.309, or a community mental health
program director or the director’s designee, that the defendant requires such level of care.
(c) If at  the time of determining the appropriate action for the case the court has not
received a recommendation as  to whether the defendant requires a hospital level of care due
to the defendant’s dangerousness  and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying
mental disorder, the court shall order a  certified evaluator or a community mental health
program director, or the director’s designee, to make such a recommendation.
(d) If the  court does not order the commitment of a defendant described in this sub-
section to the state mental  hospital or other facility, the court shall hold a hearing in ac-
cordance with subsection (2)(c) of this section to determine and order  an appropriate action
other than commitment.
[(b) The court shall ensure that an order entered under this subsection  is provided, by the end of
the next judicial day,  to any entity ordered to provide services and supervision necessary to restore the
defendant’s fitness to proceed. ]
[(3)] (6)  When a defendant is released  on supervision under subsection [ (2)(a)(B)] (4)  of this
section,  the  court may place conditions that the court deems appropriate on the release, including
the requirement that the defendant regularly report to the authority or a community mental  health
program for examination to determine if the defendant  has gained or regained capacity to stand
trial.
[(4)] (7) When the court, on its own  motion or upon the application of the superintendent of the
hospital or director of the facility in which the defendant is committed, a person  examining the de-
fendant as  a condition of release on supervision, or either party, determines, after a hearing, if a
hearing is requested, that the defendant has gained or regained fitness to  proceed, the criminal
proceeding shall be resumed.  If, however, the court is of the view that so much time has elapsed
since the commitment or release of the defendant on supervision that it  would be unjust to resume
the criminal proceeding, the court on motion of either party may dismiss the  charge and may order
the defendant to be discharged or cause a proceeding  to be commenced forthwith under ORS 426.070
to 426.170, 426.701 or 427.235 to 427.290.
[(5)] (8)  The superintendent  of a state hospital or director of a facility to which the defendant
is committed shall cause the defendant  to be evaluated within 60 days from the defendant’s delivery
into the superintendent’s or director’s custody, for the purpose of  determining whether there is a
substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will have  the capacity to stand
trial. In addition, the superintendent or director shall:
(a) Immediately notify the committing court if the defendant, at any time, gains or regains the
capacity to stand trial or will never have the capacity to stand trial.
(b) Within 90 days  of the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s or director’s custody,
notify the committing court that:
(A) The defendant has the present capacity to stand trial;
(B) There is no  substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain
or regain the capacity to stand trial; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 11
(C) There is a substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future,  the defendant will gain or
regain the capacity to stand trial. If  the probability exists, the superintendent or director shall give
the court an estimate of the time in which the defendant, with  appropriate treatment, is expected
to gain or regain capacity.
[(6)(a)] (9)(a)  If the superintendent or director  determines that there is a substantial probability
that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or  regain the capacity to stand trial, unless
the court otherwise orders, the defendant shall remain in the superintendent’s or  director’s custody
where the defendant shall receive treatment designed for the purpose of enabling the defendant  to
gain or regain capacity. In keeping with the notice requirement under subsection [ (5)(b)] (8)(b)  of
this section, the superintendent or director shall, for the duration of the defendant’s  period of com-
mitment, submit  a progress report to the committing court, concerning the defendant’s capacity or
incapacity, at least once every 180 days as measured from the date of the  defendant’s delivery into
the superintendent’s or director’s custody.
(b)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, if the superintendent or director de-
termines that a defendant committed under this section is  no longer dangerous to self or others as
a result of a qualifying mental disorder, that a hospital level of care is not necessary due to the
defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the  defendant’s qualifying mental
disorder, or that the services and  supervision necessary to [ restore] allow  the [ defendant’s] de-
fendant to gain or  regain  fitness to proceed are available in the community, the superintendent
or director shall file notice of that determination with the court.
(B) Upon receipt  of the notice, [ the court shall order the person released on supervision as de-
scribed in subsection (3)  of this section. ] the court shall order that a community mental health
program director or the director’s designee, within five judicial days:
(i) Consult with the defendant and with any local  entity that would be responsible for
supervising the defendant if  the defendant were to be released in the community to deter-
mine whether services and supervision necessary to  safely allow the defendant to gain or
regain fitness to proceed are available in the community; and
(ii) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation.
(C) Within 10 judicial days of receiving the recommendations  from the consultation, the
court shall hold a hearing to determine an appropriate action in accordance with subsection
(2)(c) of this section as follows:
(i) If, after consideration of the factors and possible actions  described in subsection (2)(c)
of this section, and  any recommendations from the consultation described in this paragraph,
the court determines that the defendant remains dangerous to self or others as a  result of
a qualifying mental disorder, a hospital level of care is necessary  due to the defendant’s
dangerousness and the acuity of  symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, and
the services and supervision necessary to allow the defendant to gain or regain fitness  to
proceed are not available in the community, the court may,  after making specific findings
to that effect, continue the commitment.
(ii) If  the court does not make the findings described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this
subparagraph, the court shall terminate the  commitment and shall set a review hearing
seven days from the date of the commitment  termination for any defendant remaining in
custody. At the review hearing, the court shall consider all relevant information  and deter-
mine an appropriate action in the case as described in subsection (2)(c) of this section.  If the
defendant remains in custody following the initial review hearing, the court shall hold fur-
ther review hearings every seven days thereafter until the defendant is no longer  in custody.
(c) A progress report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may consist of an update  to:
(A) The original examination report conducted under ORS 161.365; or
(B) An evaluation conducted under subsection  [ (5)] (8)  of this section, if the defendant did not
receive an examination under ORS 161.365.
[(7)(a)] (10)(a) A  defendant who remains committed under subsection [ (6)] (9) of this section shall
be discharged within  a period of time that is reasonable for making a determination concerning
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 12
whether or not, and when, the defendant may gain or  regain capacity. However, regardless of the
number of charges with which  the defendant is accused, in no event shall the defendant be com-
mitted for longer than whichever of the following, measured  from the defendant’s initial custody
date, is shorter:
(A) Three years; or
(B) A period of time equal to the maximum sentence  the court could have imposed if the de-
fendant had been convicted.
(b) For purposes of calculating the maximum  period of commitment described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection:
(A) The initial custody date is the date on which  the defendant is first committed under this
section on any charge alleged in the accusatory instrument; and
(B) The defendant shall be given credit against  each charge alleged in the accusatory instru-
ment:
(i) For each day the defendant is committed under this section, whether the days are consecutive
or are interrupted by a period of time during which the defendant  has gained or regained fitness to
proceed;  and
(ii) Unless the defendant is charged  on  any charging instrument  with aggravated murder or
a crime listed in ORS 137.700 (2), for each day the defendant  is held in jail  before and after the
date the defendant is  first committed , whether the days are consecutive or are interrupted by a
period of time during which the defendant lacks fitness to proceed.
[(8)] (11)  The superintendent or director shall  notify the committing court of the defendant’s
impending discharge 30 days before the date on which the superintendent or director  is required to
discharge the defendant under subsection [ (7)] (10) of this section.
[(9)] (12) When the  committing court receives a notice from the superintendent or director under
subsection [ (5)] (8)  or [ (8)] (11) of this section concerning the defendant’s progress or lack  thereof,
the committing court shall determine, after a hearing, if a hearing  is requested, whether the de-
fendant presently has the capacity to stand trial.
[(10)] (13)  If at any time the court determines  that the defendant lacks the capacity to stand
trial, the court shall further determine whether there is a substantial  probability that the defendant,
in the foreseeable future, will gain or regain the capacity to stand trial  and whether the defendant
is entitled to discharge under subsection [ (7)] (10) of this section. If the court determines that there
is no substantial probability that the defendant,  in the foreseeable future, will gain or regain the
capacity to stand trial or that the defendant  is entitled to discharge under subsection [ (7)] (10)  of
this section, the court shall dismiss, without prejudice, all charges against the defendant and:
(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or
(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070 or 427.235 to 427.290.
[(11)] (14) All  notices required under this section shall be filed with the court and may be filed
electronically. The clerk of the court shall cause copies of the notices to  be delivered to both the
district attorney and the counsel for the defendant.
[(12)] (15) If the defendant gains or regains fitness to  proceed, the term of any sentence received
by the defendant for  conviction of the crime charged shall be reduced by the amount of time the
defendant was committed under this section to the  custody of a state mental hospital, or to the
custody of a secure intensive community inpatient facility[ ,] designated by the Oregon  Health Au-
thority.
[(13)] (16) Notwithstanding  the suspension of the criminal proceeding under subsection (2) of this
section, the fact  that the defendant is unfit to proceed does not preclude any objection through
counsel and without the personal participation of the defendant on the grounds that the indictment
is insufficient, that the statute of limitations has run, that double  jeopardy principles apply or upon
any other ground at  the discretion of the court which the court deems susceptible of fair determi-
nation prior to trial.
[(14)] (17)  At the time that the  court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed
under subsection (2) of this  section, the court shall notify the defendant that federal law prohibits
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 13
the defendant  from purchasing or possessing a firearm unless the person obtains relief from the
prohibition under federal  law. The court shall again notify the defendant of the prohibition if the
court finds that the defendant has  gained or regained fitness to proceed under subsection [ (4)] (7)
of this section.
[(15)(a) Reports and evaluations conducted under this section  are confidential and may be made
available only:]
[(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney,  defendant, community mental health pro-
gram director or designee and facility in which the defendant is housed; or ]
[(B) As ordered by a court. ]
[(b) A facility in which a defendant is housed may not  use a report or evaluation conducted under
this section to support a disciplinary action against the defendant. ]
(18)(a) The entity  or evaluator conducting an examination of a defendant under this
section shall provide a copy of any  report described in this section to the community mental
health program director or designee in:
(A) The county in which the defendant is charged; and
(B) The county of the defendant’s last known residence.
(b) Reports prepared under this section are confidential and may  be made available only:
(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of  the prosecuting or
defense attorney, defendant, community mental health program director or  designee and any
facility in which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(c) Any facility in which a defendant is housed  may not use a report prepared under this
section to support a disciplinary action against the defendant.
(d) Nothing in this  subsection prohibits the prosecuting attorney, defense attorney or
agent of the prosecuting  or defense attorney from discussing the contents of a report pre-
pared under this section with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law.
(19) The court  shall ensure that an order entered under this section is provided, by the
end of the next judicial  day, to any entity ordered to provide services and supervision nec-
essary to restore the defendant’s fitness to proceed.
(20) Unless the court orders otherwise or either party objects,  a defendant committed to
a state hospital or other facility, or a certified evaluator  or other expert witness, may attend
hearings held under this section via simultaneous electronic transmission.
(21) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule standards for the  recommen-
dation provided to the court described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 161.315 is amended to read:
161.315. (1) Upon filing of notice or the introduction  of evidence by the defendant as provided
in ORS  161.309, the state shall have the right to have at least one psychiatrist or licensed psychol-
ogist of its selection examine the  defendant. The state shall file notice with the court of its intention
to have the defendant examined.
(2)(a) Upon filing of the notice, the court,  in its discretion, may order the defendant committed
to a state [ institution] mental hospital  or any other suitable facility, if the defendant is 18 years
of age or older, for observation and examination , which may include  treatment as permitted by
law [ as the court may designate for a period not to exceed 30 days ].
(b) If the defendant is under 18 years of age, upon filing of the notice, the court, in its discretion,
may order the defendant committed to a secure intensive community inpatient  facility designated
by the Oregon Health Authority for [ observation and ] examination [ as the court may  designate for a
period not to exceed 30 days ].
(c) The state mental hospital or other facility may  retain custody of a defendant com-
mitted under this subsection only for the duration necessary to complete the observation and
examination of the defendant, not to exceed 30 days.
(3) If the defendant objects to the examiner chosen by the state, the court for good  cause shown
may direct the state to select a different examiner.
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 14
(4) An examiner performing an examination  on the issue of insanity of a defendant under this
section is not obligated to examine the defendant for fitness to proceed unless, during the  exam-
ination, the examiner determines that  the defendant’s fitness to proceed is drawn in question.  If,
during the examination,  the examiner determines that the defendant’s fitness to proceed is
in doubt, the  examiner shall report the issue to the court and to the superintendent of the
state mental hospital or the superintendent’s designee, or to the director of the facility  to
which the defendant is committed. The superintendent or director may:
(a) Return the defendant to the facility from which the defendant was transported; or
(b) Inform the court  and the parties that the defendant should remain at the state
mental hospital or other  facility for the purpose of an examination under ORS 161.365. If
neither party objects, the court may order an examination under  ORS 161.365 without hold-
ing a hearing.
(5)(a) Reports resulting from examinations conducted under this section are  confidential
and may be made available only:
(A) To the court,  prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting or
defense attorney, defendant, community mental health program director or  designee and any
facility in which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(b) Any facility in which a defendant is  housed may not use a report prepared under this
section to support a disciplinary action against the defendant.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the prosecuting  attorney, defense attorney or
agent of the prosecuting or defense attorney from discussing the contents of  a report pre-
pared under this section with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law.
SECTION 3a.
If Senate Bill 25 becomes law, section 3 of this 2019 Act (amending ORS
161.315) is repealed and ORS 161.315, as amended by section 3, chapter 311, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled Senate Bill 25), is amended to read:
161.315. (1) Upon filing of notice or the  introduction of evidence by the defendant as provided
in ORS 161.309, the state shall have the right to have at least one psychiatrist or licensed  psychol-
ogist of its selection examine the  defendant. The state shall file notice with the court of its intention
to have the defendant examined.
(2)(a) Upon filing of the notice, the court, in  its discretion, may order the defendant committed
to a state [ institution] mental hospital  or any other suitable facility, if the defendant is 18 years
of age or older, for  observation and examination , which may include treatment as permitted by
law [ as the court may designate for a period not to exceed 30 days ].
(b) If the defendant is under 18 years of age, upon filing of the notice, the court, in its discretion,
may order the  defendant committed to a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated
by the Oregon Health  Authority for [ observation and ] examination [ as the court may designate for a
period not to exceed 30 days ].
(c) The state mental hospital or other  facility may retain custody of a defendant com-
mitted under this subsection only for the duration necessary to complete the observation and
examination of the defendant, not to exceed 30 days.
(3) If the defendant objects to the examiner chosen by the state, the court for good  cause shown
may direct the state to select a different examiner.
(4) An examiner performing an examination on the issue of insanity  of a defendant under this
section  is  not obligated to examine the defendant for fitness to proceed unless, during the exam-
ination, the examiner determines that the defendant’s fitness to proceed is  drawn in question.  If,
during the examination, the examiner determines that the defendant’s fitness to  proceed is
in doubt, the  examiner shall report the issue to the court and to the superintendent of the
state mental hospital or the superintendent’s designee, or to the director of the facility  to
which the defendant is committed. The superintendent or director may:
(a) Return the defendant to the facility from which the defendant was transported; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 15
(b) Inform the court  and the parties that the defendant should remain at the state
mental hospital or other  facility for the purpose of an examination under ORS 161.365. If
neither party objects, the court may order an examination under  ORS 161.365 without hold-
ing a hearing.
(5) A report resulting from an examination  under this section may be filed with the court elec-
tronically.
[(6)(a) Reports and evaluations  conducted under this section are confidential and may be made
available only:]
[(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney,  defense attorney, defendant, community mental health pro-
gram director or designee and facility in which the defendant is housed; or ]
[(B) As ordered by a court. ]
[(b) A facility in which a defendant is housed may not  use a report or evaluation conducted under
this section to support a disciplinary action against the defendant. ]
(6)(a) Reports resulting from examinations conducted under this section are  confidential
and may be made available only:
(A) To the court,  prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting or
defense attorney, defendant, community mental health program director or  designee and any
facility in which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(b) Any facility in which a defendant is  housed may not use a report prepared under this
section to support a disciplinary action against the defendant.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the prosecuting  attorney, defense attorney or
agent of the prosecuting or defense attorney from discussing the contents of  a report pre-
pared under this section with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 23, 2019
Repassed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 4, 2019
Repassed by House June 25, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 24 (SB 24-BCCA) Page 16